District of Columbia statutes.
32-212

Employer to furnish, on demand, proof of age of employee.

Whenever any person authorized to enforce this subchapter shall have reason to doubt that any minor employed in any occupation for which a permit is required by this subchapter, and for whom a work permit or vacation permit is not on file, has reached the age of 18 years, such person may make demand on such minor’s employer that such employer shall either furnish him within 10 days the evidence required for a work permit showing that the minor is in fact 18 years of age, or shall refuse to employ or permit or suffer such minor to work. In case such evidence is not furnished to such person within 10 days after such demand, the employer shall not thereafter continue to employ such minor or permit or suffer such minor to work in such establishment. Proof of the making of such demand and of failure to deliver such proof of age shall be prima facie evidence, in any prosecution brought for violation of this subchapter, that such minor is under 18 years of age and is unlawfully employed.

May 29, 1928, 45 Stat. 1002, ch. 908, § 14
renumbered as § 12 and amended June 15, 1976, D.C. Law 1-68, § 2(15), 23 DCR 521
1981 Ed., § 36-512.
1973 Ed., § 36-214.